Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB266.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.0401 is amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of KRS 164.0401 to 164.0407:
(1) "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education;
(2) "Dedicated funds" means a gift, grant, or donation to the fund that is subject to restrictions imposed by a
private grantor under KRS 164.0401 to 164.0407;
(3) "Eligible healthcare credential" means:
(a) An alcohol and drug counselor license, clinical alcohol and drug counselor license, clinical alcohol and
drug counselor associate license, professional art therapist license, professional art therapist associate
license, or community health worker certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 309;
(b) Any emergency medical services license or certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 311A;
(c) Any medical imaging, radiation, or other license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 311B;
(d) A dental hygienist or dental assistant license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 313;
(e) Any nursing license or certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 314 or registration as a state
registered nursing aide with the Kentucky Board of Nursing;
(f) A respiratory care practitioner certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 314A;
(g) Any psychology license or certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 319;
(h) Any occupational therapy license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 319A;
(i) Any behavior analyst license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 319C;
(j) Any physical therapy certificate or license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 327;
(k) Any social worker, marriage and family therapist, or professional counselor certificate or license issued
pursuant to KRS Chapter 335;
(l) A physician assistant license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 311;[ and]
(m) A dietitian license or nutritionist certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 310; and
(n) A speech-language pathology or audiology license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 334A;
(4) "Grantor" means an individual or an entity that gifts, grants, or donates moneys to the Kentucky healthcare
workforce investment fund established in KRS 164.0402;
(5) "Healthcare partner" means a grantor to the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund that is:
(a) A healthcare provider as defined in KRS 367.4081;
(b) A healthcare facility licensed by and operating in Kentucky;
(c) A qualified mental health professional as defined in KRS 202A.011; or
(d) Any healthcare or healthcare-related association, individual, or corporation doing business in and
incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth;
(6) "Healthcare program" means an education or training program that is a specific requirement to an eligible
healthcare credential, including but not limited to a high school healthcare vocational program;
(7) "Historically underserved county" means a county of the Commonwealth with enhanced workforce demands,
as demonstrated by:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Objective healthcare workforce data that demonstrates needs and demands upon its healthcare
workforce that exceed the statewide average; and
(b) Final unemployment figures calculated by the Department of Workforce Development demonstrating a
countywide rate of unemployment that exceeds the statewide unemployment rate of the
Commonwealth:
1. In the most recent five (5) consecutive calendar years; or
2. By two hundred percent (200%) in the most recent calendar year; and
(8) "Kentucky resident" is a Kentucky resident as defined by the council pursuant to KRS 164.020(8).
Signed by Governor April 3, 2026.